Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202649-1488.01
Statements; late filing fee; reduction or waiver; when.

(1) Every lobbyist or principal who fails to file a quarterly statement or a statement of activity with the Clerk of the Legislature, pursuant to sections 49-1483 and 49-1488, shall pay to the commission a late filing fee of fifty dollars for each day any of such statements are not filed in violation of such sections, but not to exceed one thousand five hundred dollars per statement.

(2) A lobbyist or principal required to pay a late filing fee pursuant to subsection (1) of this section may apply to the commission for relief. The commission by order may reduce the amount of the late filing fee imposed upon such lobbyist or principal if he or she shows the commission that (a) the circumstances indicate no intent to file late, (b) the lobbyist or principal has not been required to pay a late filing fee for two years prior to the time the filing of the statement was due, (c) the late filing of the statement shows that less than five thousand dollars was raised, received, or expended during the reporting period, and (d) a reduction of the late fee would not frustrate the purposes of the Nebraska Political Accountability and Disclosure Act.

(3) A lobbyist or principal required to pay a late filing fee pursuant to subsection (1) of this section who qualifies for an exemption to the filing of quarterly statements pursuant to subsection (5) of section 49-1483 may apply to the commission for relief. The commission by order may reduce or waive the late filing fee and the person shall not be required to make a showing as provided by subsection (2) of this section.

Laws 1991, LB 232, § 7;

Laws 1994, LB 872, § 11;

Laws 1994, LB 1243, § 12;

Laws 1998, LB 632, § 6;

Laws 1999, LB 416, § 18;

Laws 2005, LB 242, § 35;

Laws 2013, LB79, § 25;

Laws 2014, LB946, § 34;

Laws 2026, LB1075, § 64.
July 18, 2026